src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
INTRODUCTION TO MORPHOLOGICAL ANALYSER OF Rusyn LANGUAGE.

# Definitions for Multichar_Symbols

## Symbols that need to be escaped on the lower side (towards twolc): (copied from sme)

## Markers

* ¹ ² ³ ⁴ ⁵ ⁶ ⁷ ⁸ ⁹ ⁰  = Used to enumerate homonymous lemmas
* %>    = End-of-stem marker (nominals)
* %<    = End-of-stem marker (verbs)

## POS
* +A       = Adjective
* +Abbr    = Abbreviation
* +Adv     = Adverb
* +CC      = Coordinating conjunction
* +CS      = Subordinating conjunction
* +Det     = Determiner
* +Interj  = Interjection
* +N       = Noun
* +Num     = Numeral
* +Paren   = Parenthetical вводное слово
* +Pcle    = Particle
* +Po      = Postposition (ради is the only postposition)
* +Pr      = Preposition
* +Pron    = Pronoun
* +V       = Verb

## Sub-POS
* +All     = All: весь
* +Coll    = Collective numerals
* +Def     = Definite
* +Dem     = Demonstrative
* +Indef   = Indefinite: кто-то, кто-нибудь, кто-либо, кое-кто, etc.
* +Interr  = Interrogative: кто, что, какой, ли, etc.
* +Neg     = Negative: никто, некого, etc.
* +Pers    = Personal
* +Pos     = Possessive, e.g. его, наш
* +Prcnt   = Percent
* +Prop    = Proper
* +Recip   = Reciprocal: друг друга
* +Refl    = Pronoun себя, possessive свой
* +Rel     = Relativizer, e.g. который, где, как, куда, сколько, etc.
* +Symbol = independent symbols in the text stream, like £, €, ©

## Verbal MSP
* +Impf +Perf        = Imperfective, perfective
* +IV +TV            = Intransitive, transitive (Zaliznjak does not mark trans-only, so transitive verbs all have both TV and IV)
* +Inf +Imp          = Imperatives: 2nd person = читай, 1st person = прочитаем
* +Pst +Prs +Fut     = Past, present, future
* +Sg1 +Sg2 +Sg3     = person sg
* +Pl1 +Pl2 +Pl3     = person pl
* +PrsAct +PrsPss    = Participles (+PrsAct+Adv and +PstAct+Adv are used for the verbal adverbs)
* +PstAct +PstPss    = Participles
* +Pass              = Passive
* +Imprs             = Impersonal (cannot have explicit subject)
* +Lxc             = Lexicalized (for participial forms)

* +Der             = Derived (for participial forms)
* +Der/PrsAct             = Derived (for participial forms)
* +Der/PrsPss             = Derived (for participial forms)
* +Der/PstAct             = Derived (for participial forms)
* +Der/PstPss             = Derived (for participial forms)

## Nominal MSP
* +Msc +Fem +Neu +MFN   = grammatical gender,  +MFN = gender unspecifiable (pl tantum)
* +Inan +Anim +AnIn     = animacy (+AnIn = ambivalent animacy for non-accusative modifiers)
* +Sem/Sur +Sem/Pat     = Surname (фамилия), Patronymic
* +Sem/Ant +Sem/Alt     = Anthroponym/Given name, Other
* +Sg +Pl               = number
* +Nom +Acc +Gen       
* +Loc +Dat +Ins       
* +Loc2 +Gen2 +Voc     
* +Count                = Count (for человек/людей or лет/годов, etc. also шага́/шара́/часа́/etc.)
* +Ord      = Ordinal
* +Cmpar    = Comparative
* +Sint     = Synthetic comparative is possible, e.g. старее
* +Pred     = "Predicate", also used for short-form adjectives
* +Cmpnd    = "Compound", used for compounding adjectives, such as русско-английский
* +Att      = Attenuative comparatives like получше, поновее, etc.

## Punctuation
* +PUNCT    = Punctuation
* +CLB    = Clause boundary  ! TODO SENT vs CLB which is which?
* +SENT    = Clause boundary
* +COMMA   = Comma
* +DASH    = Dash
* +LQUOT    = Left quotation
* +RQUOT    = Right quotation
* +QUOT    = "Ambidextrous" quotation
* +LPAR     = Left parenthesis/bracket
* +RPAR     = Right parenthesis/bracket
* +LEFT     = Left parenthesis/bracket/quote/etc.
* +RIGHT     = Right parenthesis/bracket/quote/etc.

## Other tags
* +Prb      = +Prb(lematic): затруднительно - предположительно - нет
* +Fac      = Facultative
* +PObj     = Object of preposition (prothetic н: него нее них)
* +Epenth   = epenthesis on prepositions (о~об~обо or в~во)
* +Leng     = Lengthened доброй~доброю (marks less-canonical wordform that has more syllables)
* +Elid     = Elided (Иванович~Иваныч, новее~новей, чтобы~чтоб, или~иль, коли~коль)
* +Use/NG   = Do not generate (used for apertium, etc.)
* +Use/Obs  = Obsolete
* +Use/Ant  = Antiquated "устаревшее"
* +Err/Orth  = Spelling (orthographic) error

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/root.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-rue/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/root.lexc)</small>

---
